Hawaii, session 2025, HB767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 11-106, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§11-106 Deficient return identification envelopes.  If: (1)  A return identification envelope is returned with an unsigned affirmation; (2)  The affirmation signature does not match a reference signature image; or (3)  A return identification envelope contains another condition that would not allow the counting of the ballot, the clerk shall make an attempt to notify the voter by first class mail, telephone, or electronic mail to inform the voter of the procedure to correct the deficiency.  The voter shall have [five business] thirteen calendar days after the date of the election to cure the deficiency. The chief election officer may adopt rules regarding requirements and procedures for correcting deficient return identification envelopes.  The counting of ballots and disclosure of subsequent election results may continue during the time period permitted to cure a deficiency under this section. The clerk's inability to contact voters under this section shall not be grounds for a contest for cause under section 11-172.  This section shall apply to all return identification envelopes, including ballots utilizing the provisions of section 11-107 or chapter 15 or 15D." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________